District of Columbia statutes.
4-251.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Criminal background check” means the investigation of an individual’s criminal history through the record systems of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Metropolitan Police Department.

(1A)

“Godparent” means an individual identified in a sworn affidavit by a relative of the child by blood, marriage, domestic partnership, or adoption to have close personal or emotional ties with the child or the child’s family that pre-dated the child’s placement with the individual.

(2)

“Grandparent” means a grandparent, great-grandparent, great-aunt, and great-uncle of a child.

(3)

“Mayor” means the Mayor or a designee of the Mayor.

(3A)

“Relative caregiver” means an individual who is the primary caretaker of the child and is related to the child by blood, marriage, domestic partnership, or adoption or is a godparent of the child.

(4)

“Temporary Assistance for Needy Families” or “TANF” means the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program established by § 4-202.01.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-69, § 101, 53 DCR 54
Dec. 15, 2015, D.C. Law 21-40, § 2(a), 62 DCR 13746

History

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-40 added (1A) and (3A).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-177, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 21).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-278, February 22, 2006, 53 DCR 1459).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-508, Dec. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 12717, 20 STAT 4429).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-33, Mar. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 4540, 21 DCSTAT 870).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Foster Care Extended Eligibility Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-200, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15270).

Emergency Legislation